Hawaii statutes.
[§468M-4] Payment provision. Unless
the express written contract has a provision to the contrary, payment shall be
due and payable thirty days from the date of invoice. [L 1990, c 214, pt of §1,
§2; ree L 1991, c 240, pt of §1, §§2, 4; ren and am L 1992, c 231, pt of §2,
§§3, 6; am L 1995, c 174, §§1, 2; am L 1998, c 248, §§1, 2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next